Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 1

Definitions and Fiduciary Duties

35-6-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Principal and Income Act”.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 35-6-101 — 35-6-115 (Acts 1955, ch. 81, §§ 1-15; 1965, ch. 360, § 1; Acts 1986, ch. 591, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 35-701 — 35-715), a former version of the Uniform Principal and Income Act, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1, eff. July 1, 2000. For current provisions, see this chapter.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 443, 1018.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

Where There's a Will: “Total return trusts” come to Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

35-6-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accounting period” means a calendar year unless another twelve-month period is selected by a fiduciary. The term includes a portion of a calendar year or other twelve-month period that begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.

“Beneficiary” includes, in the case of a decedent's estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee and, in the case of a trust, an income beneficiary and a remainder beneficiary.

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative or a trustee. The term includes an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special administrator, and a person performing substantially the same function.

“Income” means money or property that a fiduciary receives as current return from a principal asset. The term includes a portion of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal asset, to the extent provided in part 4 of this chapter.

“Income beneficiary” means a person to whom net income of a trust is or may be payable.

“Income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive all or part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require it to be distributed or authorize it to be distributed in the trustee's discretion.

“Mandatory income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.

“Net income” means the total receipts allocated to income during an accounting period minus the disbursements made from income during the period, plus or minus transfers under this chapter to or from income during the period.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to a remainder beneficiary when the trust terminates.

“Remainder beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive principal when an income interest ends.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the intent of a settlor or decedent with respect to the trust, expressed in a manner that admits of its proof in a judicial proceeding, whether by written or spoken words or by conduct.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

35-6-103. Fiduciary duties — General principles.

In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of title 35, chapter 6, a fiduciary:

Shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust or the will, even if there is a different provision in this chapter;

May administer a trust or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust or the will, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter;

Shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this chapter if the terms of the trust or the will do not contain a different provision or do not give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration; and

Shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the terms of the trust and this chapter do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.

In exercising the power to adjust under § 35-6-104(a) or a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter, whether granted by the terms of a trust, or will or this chapter, a fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, considering any terms of the trust or the will manifesting the trustors' or testators' intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one (1) or more of the beneficiaries. A determination in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Unitrust in Estate Planning: A Partial Panacea, 21 Vand. L. Rev. 1023 (1968).

35-6-104. Trustee's power to adjust.

A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent the trustee considers necessary if:

The trustee invests and manages trust assets as a prudent investor;

The terms of the trust describe the amount that may or must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust's income; and

The trustee determines, after applying the rules in § 35-6-103(a), that the trustee is unable to comply with § 35-6-103(b).

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to make adjustments under this section, the trustee may consider, but is not limited to, any of the following:

The nature, purpose, and expected duration of the trust;

The intent of the settlor;

The identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;

The needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of capital;

The assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;

The net amount allocated to income under the other sections of this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation; and

The anticipated tax consequences of an adjustment.

A trustee may not make an adjustment:

That disqualifies the trust for an estate tax or gift tax marital or charitable deduction that would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the adjustment;

That reduces the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;

That changes the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

From any amount that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under a will or the terms of a trust unless both income and principal are so set aside;

If possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes all or part of the trust assets to be included for estate tax purposes in the estate of an individual who has the power to remove a trustee or appoint a trustee, or both, and the assets would not be included in the estate of the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

If the trustee is not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or indirectly.

If subdivision (c)(5), (6), (7), or (8) applies to a trustee and there is more than one (1) trustee, a cotrustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust.

A trustee may release the entire power conferred by subsection (a) or may release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in subdivision (c)(1)-(6) or (c)(8), or if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c). The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

Terms of a trust that limit the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income do not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from the terms of the trust that the terms are intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred by subsection (a).

Nothing in this section or in this chapter is intended to create or imply a duty to make an adjustment, and a trustee is not liable for not considering whether to make an adjustment or for choosing not to make an adjustment.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1; 2004, ch. 866, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Where There's a Will: “Total return trusts” come to Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

35-6-105. Optional notice.

A trustee may, but is not required to, give a notice of proposed action regarding a matter governed by this chapter as provided in this section. For the purpose of this section, a proposed action includes:

An individual action;

A course of action; or

A decision not to take action.

If the trustee decides to give notice, the trustee shall mail notice of the proposed action to all adult beneficiaries who are receiving, or are entitled to receive, income under the trust or to receive a distribution of principal if the trust were terminated at the time the notice is given.

Notice of proposed action need not be given to any person who consents in writing to the proposed action. The consent may be executed at any time before or after the proposed action is taken.

The notice of proposed action shall state that it is given pursuant to this section and shall state all of the following:

The name and mailing address of the trustee;

The name and telephone number of a person who may be contacted for additional information;

A description of the action proposed to be taken and an explanation of the reasons for the action;

The time within which objections to the proposed action can be made, which shall be at least sixty (60) days from the mailing of the notice of proposed action; and

The date on or after which the proposed action may be taken or is effective.

A beneficiary may object to the proposed action by mailing a written objection to the trustee at the address stated in the notice of proposed action within the time period specified in the notice of proposed action.

A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for an action regarding a matter governed by this chapter if the trustee does not receive a written objection to the proposed action from the beneficiary within the applicable period and the other requirements of this section are satisfied. If no beneficiary entitled to notice objects under this section, the trustee is not liable to any current or future beneficiary with respect to the proposed action.

If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable period, either the trustee or a beneficiary may petition the court to have the proposed action taken as proposed, taken with modifications, or denied. In the proceeding, a beneficiary objecting to the proposed action has the burden of proving that the trustee's proposed action should not be taken. A beneficiary who has not objected is not estopped from opposing the proposed action in the proceeding. If the trustee decides not to implement the proposed action, the trustee shall notify the beneficiaries of the decision not to take the action and the reasons for the decision, and the trustee's decision not to implement the proposed action does not itself give rise to liability to any current or future beneficiary. A beneficiary may petition the court to have the action taken, and has the burden of proving that it should be taken.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

Collateral References.

Modern status of rules governing allocations of stock dividends or splits between principal and income. 81 A.L.R.3d 876.

35-6-106. Remedy.

With respect to a trustee's exercise or nonexercise of the power to make an adjustment under § 35-5-104, the sole remedy is to direct, deny, or revise an adjustment between principal and income.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

Stock Dividends and Trusts Created Prior to March 1, 1955: Should the Uniform Principal And Income Act Apply?, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 688 (1971).

Collateral References.

Modern status of rules governing allocations of stock dividends or splits between principal and income. 81 A.L.R.3d 876.

35-6-107. Records.

A trustee who elects to exercise any power or not to exercise any power under this chapter shall maintain only such records that may be necessary or appropriate in the discretion of the trustee to support such determination at the time the determination is made and shall not be required to maintain records not necessary for the administration of the trust.

Acts 2000, ch. 829, § 1.

35-6-108. Total return unitrusts.

In this section:

“Disinterested person” means a person who is not a “related or subordinate party,” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 672(c), with respect to the person then acting as trustee of the trust and excludes the trustor of the trust and any interested trustee;

“Income trust” means a trust, created by either an inter vivos or a testamentary instrument, which directs or permits the trustee to distribute the net income of the trust to one (1) or more persons, either in fixed proportions or in amounts or proportions determined by the trustee and regardless of whether the trust directs or permits the trustee to distribute the principal of the trust to one (1) or more such persons;

“Interested distributee” means a person to whom distributions of income or principal can currently be made who has the power to remove the existing trustee and designate as successor a person who may be a “related or subordinate party,” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 672(c), with respect to such distributee;

“Interested trustee” means an individual trustee who is a qualified beneficiary or any trustee who may be removed and replaced by an interested distributee, or an individual trustee whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be satisfied by distributions of income and principal of the trust;

“Internal Revenue Code” refers to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and any references to a section of such shall include any successor, substituted, or amended section of the Internal Revenue Code;

“Total return unitrust” means an income trust that has been converted under this section or the laws of any other jurisdiction that permits an income trust to be converted to a trust in which a unitrust amount is treated as the net income of the trust;

“Trustee” means all persons acting as trustee of the trust, except where expressly noted otherwise, whether acting in their discretion or on the direction of one (1) or more persons acting in a fiduciary capacity;

“Trustor” means an individual who created an inter vivos or a testamentary trust;

“Qualified beneficiaries” means those beneficiaries of a trust specified in § 35-15-103(24); and

“Unitrust amount” means an amount computed as a percentage of the fair market value of the trust.

A trustee, other than an interested trustee, or where two (2) or more persons are acting as trustee, a majority of the trustees who are not an interested trustee, in either case hereafter “trustee”, may, in its sole discretion and without court approval:

Convert an income trust to a total return unitrust;

In the case of a total return unitrust converted under this section or the laws of any other jurisdiction, reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust; or

In the case of a total return unitrust converted under this section or the laws of any other jurisdiction, change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust if all of the following apply:

The trustee adopts a written policy for the trust providing:

In the case of a trust being administered as an income trust, that future distributions from the trust will be unitrust amounts rather than net income;

In the case of a trust being administered as a total return unitrust, that future distributions from the trust will be net income rather than unitrust amounts; or

That the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust will be changed as stated in the policy;

The trustee sends written notice of its intention to take such action, along with copies of such written policy and this section, to the trustor of the trust, if living, and to all qualified beneficiaries of the trust;

At least one (1) person receiving notice under subdivision (b)(3)(B) is legally competent; and

No person receiving such notice objects, by written instrument delivered to the trustee, to the proposed action of the trustee within thirty (30) days of receipt of such notice.

If there is no trustee of the trust other than an interested trustee, the interested trustee or, where two (2) or more persons are acting as trustee and are interested trustees, a majority of such interested trustees may, in its sole discretion and without court approval:

Convert an income trust to a total return unitrust;

Reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust; or

Change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust if all of the following apply:

The trustee adopts a written policy for the trust providing:

In the case of a trust being administered as an income trust, that future distributions from the trust will be unitrust amounts rather than net income;

In the case of a trust being administered as a total return unitrust, that future distributions from the trust will be net income rather than unitrust amounts; or

That the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust will be changed as stated in the policy;

The trustee appoints a disinterested person who, in its sole discretion but acting in a fiduciary capacity, determines for the trustee:

The percentage to be used to calculate the unitrust amount;

The method to be used in determining the fair market value of the trust; and

Which assets, if any, are to be excluded in determining the unitrust amount;

The trustee sends written notice of its intention to take such action, along with copies of such written policy and this section, and the determinations of the disinterested person to the trustor of the trust, if living, and to all qualified beneficiaries of the trust;

At least one (1) person receiving notice under subdivision (c)(3)(C), of this section is legally competent; and

No person receiving such notice objects, by written instrument delivered to the trustee, to the proposed action or the determinations of the disinterested person within thirty (30) days of receipt of such notice.

If any trustee desires to convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust, or change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust but does not have the ability to or elects not to do it under subsection (b) or (c), the trustee may petition the court for such order as the trustee deems appropriate. In the event, however, there is only one (1) trustee of such trust and such trustee is an interested trustee or in the event there are two (2) or more trustees of such trust and a majority of them are interested trustees, the court, in its own discretion or on the petition of such trustee or trustees or any person interested in the trust, may appoint a disinterested person who, acting in a fiduciary capacity, shall present such information to the court as shall be necessary to enable the court to make its determinations hereunder.

The fair market value of the trust shall be determined at least annually, using such valuation date or dates or averages of valuation dates as are deemed appropriate. Assets for which a fair market value cannot be readily ascertained shall be valued using such valuation methods as are deemed reasonable and appropriate. Assets used by a trust beneficiary, such as a residence property or tangible personal property, may be excluded from fair market value for computing the unitrust amount.

The percentage to be used in determining the unitrust amount shall be a reasonable current return from the trust, in any event not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%), taking into account the intentions of the trustor of the trust as expressed in the governing instrument, the needs of the beneficiaries, general economic conditions, projected current earnings and appreciation for the trust, and projected inflation and its impact on the trust.

Following the conversion of an income trust to a total return unitrust, the trustee:

Shall consider the unitrust amount as paid from net accounting income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as paid from ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

After calculating the trust's capital gain net income described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(9), may consider the unitrust amount as paid from net short-term capital gain described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(5) and then from net long-term capital gain described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(7); and

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as coming from the principal of the trust.

In administering a total return unitrust, the trustee may, in its sole discretion but subject to the governing instrument, determine:

The effective date of the conversion;

The timing of distributions, including, but not limited to, provisions for prorating a distribution for a short year in which a beneficiary's right to payments commences or ceases;

Whether distributions are to be made in cash or in kind or partly in cash and partly in kind;

If the trust is reconverted to an income trust, the effective date of such reconversion; and

Such other administrative issues as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

Conversion to a total return unitrust under this section shall not affect any other provision of the governing instrument, if any, regarding distributions of principal.

In the case of a trust for which a marital deduction has been taken for federal tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. § 2056 or § 2523, the spouse otherwise entitled to receive the net income of the trust shall have the right, by written instrument delivered to the trustee, to compel the reconversion during that spouse's lifetime of the trust from a total return unitrust to an income trust, notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary.

This section shall be construed as pertaining to the administration of a trust and shall be available to any trust including a trust initially converted to a total return unitrust under the laws of another jurisdiction that is administered in Tennessee under Tennessee law or to any trust, regardless of its place of administration, whose governing instrument provides that Tennessee law governs matters of construction or administration unless:

The governing instrument reflects an intention that the current beneficiary or beneficiaries are to receive an amount other than a reasonable current return from the trust;

The trust is a pooled income fund described in 26 U.S.C. § 642(c)(5) or a charitable-remainder trust described in 26 U.S.C. § 664(d); and

The governing instrument expressly prohibits use of this section by specific reference to the section or expressly states the trustor's intent that net income not be calculated as a unitrust amount.

Any of the following statements in the governing instrument, or words similar to such statements, shall be sufficient to preclude the use of this section:

The provisions of § 35-6-109, as amended, or any corresponding provision of future law, shall not be used in the administration of this trust; or

My trustee shall not determine the distributions to the income beneficiary as a unitrust amount.

Any trustee or disinterested person who in good faith takes or fails to take any action under this section shall not be liable to any person affected by such action or inaction, regardless of whether such person received written notice as provided in this section and regardless of whether such person was under a legal disability at the time of the delivery of such notice. Such person's exclusive remedy shall be to obtain an order of the court directing the trustee to convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, to reconvert from a total return unitrust to an income trust or to change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount.

This section shall be available to trusts in existence on July 1, 2010, or created thereafter.

Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21; 2018, ch. 887, § 1; 2019, ch. 197, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21 purported to enact §§ 35-17-101 and 35-17-102. In comments jointly proposed by the Estate and Probate Section of the Tennessee Bar Association, the Probate Study Committee of the Tennessee Bar Association, and the Trust Committee of the Tennessee Bankers Association, as authorized by 725, Acts of 2010, ch. 725, § 24, it was recommended that the enactments by Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21 be enacted as §§ 35-6-108 and 35-6-109, respectively.

Compiler's Notes. The Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is compiled in title 26 U.S.C.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added “, or gives the trustee no discretion to distribute any trust principal to the income beneficiary under any circumstances” at the end of (k)(1)(A); deleted “; described in 26 U.S.C. § 664(d)” at the end of (k)(1)(B); and added “Except for testamenatry trusts established prior to July 1, 2010,” at the beginning of (k)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment, in (k)(1), deleted “, or gives the trustee no discretion to distribute any trust principal to the income beneficiary under any circumstances” at the end of (A); inserted “described in 26 U.S.C. § 664(d)” at the end of (B); and deleted “Except for testamentary trusts established prior to July 1, 2010,” at the beginning of (C).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 887, § 2. May 3, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 197, § 8. April 25, 2019.

35-6-109. Express total return unitrusts.

This section shall apply to a trust that, by its governing instrument, requires or permits the distribution, at least annually, of a unitrust amount equal to a fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%) per year of the fair market value of the trust's assets, valued at least annually, such trust to be referred to in this section as an “express total return unitrust”.

The unitrust amount for an express total return unitrust may be determined by reference to the fair market value of the trust's assets in one (1) year or more than one (1) year.

Distribution of such a fixed percentage unitrust amount is considered a distribution of all of the income of the express total return unitrust.

An express total return unitrust may or may not provide a mechanism for changing the unitrust percentage similar to the mechanism provided under § 35-6-108, based upon the factors noted therein, and may or may not provide for a conversion from a unitrust to an income trust and/or a reconversion of an income trust to a unitrust similar to the mechanism under § 35-6-108.

If an express total return unitrust does not specifically or by reference to § 35-6-108 deny a power to change the unitrust percentage or to convert to an income trust, then the trustee shall have such power and the express total return unitrust shall be deemed to be a “total return unitrust” within the meaning of § 35-6-108 for purposes of applying § 35-6-108 to the trust.

The distribution of a fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%) reasonably apportions the total return of an express total return unitrust.

The trust instrument may grant discretion to the trustee to adopt a consistent practice of treating capital gains as part of the unitrust distribution, to the extent that the unitrust distribution exceeds the net accounting income, or it may specify the ordering of such classes of income.

Unless the terms of the trust specifically provide otherwise, a distribution of the unitrust amount from an express total return unitrust shall be considered to have been made from the following sources in order of priority:

From net accounting income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

From ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

After calculating the trust's capital gain net income as described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(9), from net realized short-term capital gain as described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(5) and then from net realized long-term capital gain described in 26 U.S.C. § 1222(7); and

From the principal of the trust.

The trust instrument may provide that assets:

For which a fair market value cannot be readily ascertained shall be valued using such valuation methods as are deemed reasonable and appropriate; and

Used by a trust beneficiary, such as a residence property or tangible personal property, may be excluded from the net fair market value for computing the unitrust amount.

In this section, “Internal Revenue Code” refers to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (U.S.C. title 26), and any references to a section thereof shall include any successor, substituted, or amended section of the Internal Revenue Code.

Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21 purported to enact §§ 35-17-101 and 35-17-102. In comments jointly proposed by the Estate and Probate Section of the Tennessee Bar Association, the Probate Study Committee of the Tennessee Bar Association, and the Trust Committee of the Tennessee Bankers Association, as authorized by 725, Acts of 2010, ch. 725, § 24, it was recommended that the enactments by Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 21 be enacted as §§ 35-6-108 and 35-6-109, respectively.